Rhode Island statutes. Title 14 Delinquent and Dependent Children
Chapter 4 O’Rourke Children’s Center

14-4-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 87, §§ 1, 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 102, §§ 1, 6; impl. am. P.L. 1917, ch. 1470, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 114, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 1948, ch. 2114, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

14-4-1

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 69, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 100, § 2, effective June 30, 2017.

14-4-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 87, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 102, § 7; P.L. 1922, ch. 2211, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 114, § 2; P.L. 1930, ch. 1574, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 66, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

14-4-2

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 69, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 100, § 2, effective June 30, 2017.

14-4-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, 87, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 102, § 8; P.L.1909, ch. 403, § 1; P.L. 1912, ch. 833, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 114, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 66, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1948, ch. 2114, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

14-4-3

; P.L. 1970, ch. 203, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 69, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 100, § 2, effective June 30, 2017.

14-4-3.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 82, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 69, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 100, § 2, effective June 30, 2017.

14-4-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 87, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 102, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 114, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 66, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

14-4-4

; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 69, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 100, § 2, effective June 30, 2017.

14-4-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 192, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 69, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 100, § 2, effective June 30, 2017.